Hawaii statutes.
§91-14 Judicial review of contested cases.
(a) Any person aggrieved by a final decision and order in a contested case or
by a preliminary ruling of the nature that deferral of review pending entry of
a subsequent final decision would deprive appellant of adequate relief is
entitled to judicial review thereof under this chapter; but nothing in this
section shall be deemed to prevent resort to other means of review, redress,
relief, or trial de novo, including the right of trial by jury, provided by law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, for the
purposes of this section, the term "person aggrieved" shall include
an agency that is a party to a contested case proceeding before that agency or
another agency.

(b) Except as otherwise provided herein,
proceedings for review shall be instituted in the circuit court or, if
applicable, the environmental court, within thirty days after the preliminary
ruling or within thirty days after service of the certified copy of the final decision
and order of the agency pursuant to rule of court, except where a statute
provides for a direct appeal to the intermediate appellate court, subject to
chapter 602. In such cases, the appeal shall be treated in the same manner as
an appeal from the circuit court to the intermediate appellate court, including
payment of the fee prescribed by section 607-5 for filing the notice of appeal
(except in cases appealed under sections 11-51 and 40-91). The court in its
discretion may permit other interested persons to intervene.

(c) The proceedings for review shall not stay
enforcement of the agency decisions or the confirmation of any fine as a
judgment pursuant to section 92-17(g); but the reviewing court may order a stay
if the following criteria have been met:

(1) There is likelihood that the subject person will
prevail on the merits of an appeal from the administrative proceeding to the
court;

(2) Irreparable damage to the subject person will
result if a stay is not ordered;

(3) No irreparable damage to the public will result
from the stay order; and

(4) Public interest will be served by the stay order.

(d) Within twenty days after the determination
of the contents of the record on appeal in the manner provided by the rules of
court, or within such further time as the court may allow, the agency shall
transmit to the reviewing court the record of the proceeding under review. The
court may require or permit subsequent corrections or additions to the record
when deemed desirable.

(e) If, before the date set for hearing,
application is made to the court for leave to present additional evidence
material to the issue in the case, and it is shown to the satisfaction of the
court that the additional evidence is material and that there were good reasons
for failure to present it in the proceeding before the agency, the court may
order that the additional evidence be taken before the agency upon such
conditions as the court deems proper. The agency may modify its findings,
decision, and order by reason of the additional evidence and shall file with
the reviewing court, to become a part of the record, the additional evidence,
together with any modifications or new findings or decision.

(f) The review shall be conducted by the
appropriate court without a jury and shall be confined to the record, except
that in the cases where a trial de novo, including trial by jury, is provided
by law and also in cases of alleged irregularities in procedure before the
agency not shown in the record, testimony thereon may be taken in court. The
court shall, upon request by any party, hear oral arguments and receive written
briefs.

(g) Upon review of the record the court may
affirm the decision of the agency or remand the case with instructions for
further proceedings; or it may reverse or modify the decision and order if the
substantial rights of the petitioners may have been prejudiced because the
administrative findings, conclusions, decisions, or orders are:

(1) In violation of constitutional or statutory
provisions; or

(2) In excess of the statutory authority or
jurisdiction of the agency; or

(3) Made upon unlawful procedure; or

(4) Affected by other error of law; or

(5) Clearly erroneous in view of the reliable,
probative, and substantial evidence on the whole record; or

(6) Arbitrary, or capricious, or characterized by
abuse of discretion or clearly unwarranted exercise of discretion.

(h) Upon a trial de novo, including a trial by
jury as provided by law, the court shall transmit to the agency its decision
and order with instructions to comply with the order. [L 1961, c 103, §14;
Supp, §6C-14; HRS §91-14; am L 1973, c 31, §5; am L 1974, c 145, §1; am L 1979,
c 111, §9; am L 1980, c 130, §2; am L 1983, c 160, §1; am L 1986, c 274, §1; am
L 1993, c 115, §1; am L 2004, c 202, §8; am L 2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109,
§1; am L 2014, c 218, §4]

Rules of Court

Appeal to circuit court, see HRCP rule 72; appeal to
appellate courts, see Hawaii Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Attorney General Opinions

Cost of record transmitted to the reviewing court is borne by
the agency. Att. Gen. Op. 64-4.

Law Journals and Reviews

Standing to Challenge Administrative Action in the Federal
and Hawaiian Courts. 8 HBJ 37.

Appellate Standards of Review in Hawaii. 7 UH L. Rev. 273.
(See also 7 UH L. Rev. 449.)

An Analysis of the Standing and Jurisdiction Prerequisites
for Direct Appeal of Agency Actions to the Circuit Court Under the Hawaii
Administrative Procedure Act After Bush v. Hawaiian Homes Commission and Pele
Defense Fund v. Puna Geothermal Venture. 17 UH L. Rev. 375.

Hawai`i Appellate Standards of Review Revisited. 18 UH L.
Rev. 645.

Case Notes

Section contained appropriate statute of limitations for
State to file action in federal court under Education For All Handicapped
Children Act. 695 F.2d 1154.

Plaintiff's 42 U.S.C. §1983 action against dental board
barred by res judicata as plaintiff failed to seek state court judicial review
of dental board's order failing plaintiff on dental exam. 60 F.3d 626.

Plaintiff must exhaust its administrative remedy in the
circuit court before it may pursue its state law claims, as required by
§281-17; thus, defendants' motion to dismiss plaintiff's state law claims
under the state constitution, chapter 281, and the liquor commission rules,
granted. 681 F. Supp. 2d 1209.

Review of decision of civil service commission is on the
record. 48 H. 278, 398 P.2d 155.

Question whether provision for appeal of preliminary ruling
overrides provisions of specific statutes governing administrative agencies,
raised but not decided. 50 H. 22, 428 P.2d 411.

Procedure applicable to grant of summary judgment after
appeal to circuit court. 50 H. 169, 434 P.2d 312.

Subsection (g) referred to: 50 H. 426, 442 P.2d 61.

Where zoning variance is granted after public hearing, owner
of land adjoining the property subject to variance is "person aggrieved".
52 H. 518, 479 P.2d 796.

"Person aggrieved", to be entitled to judicial
review, must have been involved in the contested case. 53 H. 431, 495 P.2d
1180.

"Person aggrieved". 56 H. 260, 535 P.2d 1102; 64
H. 451, 643 P.2d 73.

Test under "clearly erroneous" standard is whether
appellate court has a firm and definite conviction mistake was made. 56 H.
552, 545 P.2d 692; 4 H. App. 26, 659 P.2d 77.

Where tenure hearing not required, application did not create
"contested case". 56 H. 680, 548 P.2d 253.

"Clearly erroneous" standard applies to review of
labor and industrial relations appeals board decisions. 57 H. 296, 555 P.2d
855.

Nature of appeal to circuit court under this section
discussed. 58 H. 292, 568 P.2d 1189.

Appeal from decision of administrative agency acting without
jurisdiction confers no jurisdiction on appellate court. 60 H. 65, 587 P.2d
301.

Paragraph (g) cited as authority to remand a cause to the
public utilities commission to make appropriate findings to support its order.
60 H. 166, 590 P.2d 524.

"Clearly erroneous" standard of review discussed.
60 H. 166, 590 P.2d 524; 66 H. 401, 664 P.2d 727; 67 H. 212, 685 P.2d 794; 2 H.
App. 421, 633 P.2d 564.

Final order means an order ending the proceedings.
Appellee's actions were not clearly erroneous or arbitrary and capricious where
appellant's filing of a grievance was untimely. 60 H. 513, 591 P.2d 621.

Standard of review under subsection (g) for decisions of
administrative agencies acting within sphere of expertise. 60 H. 625, 594 P.2d
612; 5 H. App. 71, 678 P.2d 584.

Organization opposing reclassification of properties and
which is composed of members who live in vicinity of properties is a
"person aggrieved" under subsection (a). 61 H. 3, 594 P.2d 1079.

"Participation in contested case" discussed. 61 H.
3, 594 P.2d 1079.

Timely appeal. 61 H. 3, 594 P.2d 1079.

Mere failure to include name of agency (which rendered
decision being appealed) in caption of notice of appeal does not render appeal
defective. 62 H. 444, 616 P.2d 1368.

Finality of order, what determines. 63 H. 85, 621 P.2d 361.

So long as requirements of subsection (a) are met, the
circuit court is vested with jurisdiction to hear appeal. 63 H. 85, 621 P.2d
361.

Land use commission. Final order. 63 H. 529, 631 P.2d 588.

Court did not abuse discretion in refusing to allow expert
witnesses to testify in court, or refusing to require transcript of oral
comments before agency. 64 H. 27, 636 P.2d 158.

Decision of administrative agency was clearly erroneous. 65
H. 146, 648 P.2d 1107.

Department of education was not a "person" with
standing to appeal administrative action. 65 H. 219, 649 P.2d 1140.

Granting of special management area permit by county planning
commission. 65 H. 506, 654 P.2d 874.

Agency's decision to reduce welfare benefits is reviewable
only by appeal under this section and not by declaratory judgment action. 66
H. 485, 666 P.2d 1133.

Agency's procedural irregularities did not prejudice
appellant's substantial rights. 67 H. 342, 686 P.2d 831.

Board's denial of a motion for reconsideration is a
"final order". 67 H. 603, 699 P.2d 26.

Police chief is a "person" with a standing to
appeal civil service commission's ruling. 68 H. 432, 718 P.2d 1076.

Apprenticeship committee was not "person aggrieved"
by labor director's rejection of its recommendation; apprentice denied back
wages and attorney's fees and costs upon reinstatement was "person
aggrieved". 68 H. 605, 723 P.2d 753.

Unincorporated association was "person aggrieved"
by decision to grant special management area permit, but association did not
participate in a "contested case". 69 H. 81, 734 P.2d 161.

Judicial review of an agency determination must be confined
to issues properly raised in the record of the administrative proceedings. 69
H. 135, 736 P.2d 1271.

Does not give administrative agencies the right to take an
appeal from an administrative action, but the agency may support an appeal
taken by an aggrieved party. 71 H. 545, 798 P.2d 442.

Standard used by appellate court when reviewing circuit
court's review of agency decision. 74 H. 599, 851 P.2d 311; 78 H. 21, 889 P.2d
705; 79 H. 154, 900 P.2d 161.

Subsection (g)(1) applied under right/wrong standard in
review of circuit court's review of employees' retirement system declaratory
order, where issue presented to circuit court concerned a question of statutory
interpretation. 75 H. 42, 856 P.2d 1227.

Without a statutory, rule-based, or constitutional mandate
for a hearing, the Hawaiian homes commission hearing that took place was not
required by law and therefore did not constitute a contested case for the
purposes of obtaining appellate review pursuant to subsection (a);
consequently, judicial review by circuit court of commission's denial of
appellants' request for a contested case hearing as well as review of commission's
approval of third-party agreements was unattainable due to lack of subject
matter jurisdiction. 76 H. 128, 870 P.2d 1272.

Supreme court could not conclude that board of land and
natural resources' findings regarding application for conservation district use
permit were clearly erroneous. 76 H. 259, 874 P.2d 1084.

Circuit court properly concluded that it was vested with
appellate jurisdiction pursuant to subsection (a). With respect to issue of
standing, certain appellees demonstrated sufficient participation and potential
injury in fact to seek judicial review of agency decision; other appellees who
did not sufficiently participate in contested case were precluded from seeking
judicial review under subsection (a). 77 H. 64, 881 P.2d 1210.

"Clearly erroneous" standard applies to appeals
from findings in decisions of labor and industrial relations appeals board. 77
H. 100, 881 P.2d 1246.

Appeal to circuit court of zoning board of appeals' final
decision and order was timely, and circuit court properly exercised
jurisdiction over the matter. 77 H. 168, 883 P.2d 629.

Supreme court lacked appellate jurisdiction where there was
no final decision with respect to claimant's workers' compensation benefits for
incident which labor and industrial relations appeals board determined to be
compensable. 77 H. 305, 884 P.2d 368.

Circuit court's appellate jurisdiction proper where planning
commission rendered its final view, appellant was involved "in" the
contested case and sufficiently demonstrated standing to participate. 79 H.
425, 903 P.2d 1246.

A water management area designation is not the product of a
contested case hearing, under this chapter, from which a direct appeal to the
supreme court may be brought under §174C-60. 83 H. 484, 927 P.2d 1367.

Where director's violation of §91-13 by consulting materials
and individuals outside the record did not prejudice appellant's substantial
rights, harmless error. 87 H. 217, 953 P.2d 1315.

Where county planning director's decision that developer's
proposed action was inconsistent with community plan did not meet any of the
standards for reversal under subsection (g), circuit court erred in reversing
decision. 88 H. 108, 962 P.2d 367.

Where no express procedure provided in Maui charter or Maui
special management area rules for appeal of Maui planning director's decision
on a minor permit application to the Maui planning commission, and commission
delegated authority to render final decision on minor permit applications to
director pursuant to §205A-22, director's decision not to process developer's
application was a final decision equivalent to a denial of the application and
was thus appealable under subsection (a). 88 H. 108, 962 P.2d 367.

A decision that finally adjudicates the matter of medical and
temporary disability benefits under §§386-21, 386-31(b), and 386-32(b) is an
appealable final order under subsection (a), even though the matter of
permanent disability benefits under §§386-31(a) and 386-32(a) has been left for
later determination. 89 H. 436, 974 P.2d 1026.

Where entitlement to permanent disability or disfigurement
benefits is the right of the claimant that remains undetermined and is the
matter for which jurisdiction is retained by the labor director, a decision of
the labor and industrial relations appeals board that otherwise finally
adjudicates the matters of medical and temporary disability benefits is an
appealable final order under subsection (a). 89 H. 436, 974 P.2d 1026.

Where county board of appeals at no time questioned or
disclaimed planning director's action, and director could not have issued
denial of appeal on director's own authority, director acted on behalf of board
when director summarily rejected plaintiffs' appeals as untimely; thus,
director's denial constituted a "final decision" by the board under
subsection (a), which circuit court had jurisdiction to review on appeal. 90
H. 384, 978 P.2d 822.

Where plaintiffs' members, as native Hawaiians who exercised
such rights as were customarily and traditionally exercised for subsistence,
cultural, and religious purposes, sufficiently demonstrated injury to their
interests for purposes of appeal under this chapter, the trial court properly
concluded that plaintiff had standing to invoke judicial resolution of the land
use commission's decision. 94 H. 31, 7 P.3d 1068.

Where plaintiffs sufficiently demonstrated an "injury in
fact" by alleging facts to show that its members were recreational users
of the petition area and that land use commission's action would
"diminish" such use, and also asserted their interests in protecting
West Hawaii's scenic, aesthetic, historic, and biological resources, they were
"persons aggrieved" within the meaning of this section and trial
court did not err in concluding plaintiff had standing to seek judicial review
of the commission's decision. 94 H. 31, 7 P.3d 1068.

An order regarding the award or denial of attorney's fees and
costs with respect to §386-93(b) is a final order under subsection (a) for
purposes of appeal; this final order rule applies prospectively to prevent injustice;
§386-93(b) allows assessment of attorney's fees and costs against an employer
if the employer loses the final appeal. 104 H. 164, 86 P.3d 973.

A contested case hearing pursuant to subsection (a) was not
required in the determination by the labor director to register an
apprenticeship program pursuant to §372-4. 104 H. 275, 88 P.3d 647.

District family courts may not exercise judicial review of
administrative proceedings conducted pursuant to the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act. 105 H. 38, 93 P.3d 1145.

The agency-specific appellate procedure prescribed in §232-17
precluded appellants' resort to judicial review under subsection (a);
jurisdiction to hear appellants' tax appeal rested exclusively with the tax
appeal court. 106 H. 318, 104 P.3d 905.

Orders disposing of petitions for declaratory rulings under
§91-8 are appealable to the circuit court pursuant to this section; thus,
circuit court had proper jurisdiction to review Hawaii labor relations board
order. 107 H. 178, 111 P.3d 587.

Where the purpose of the land use commission's hearing was
not to determine the rights, duties, or privileges of specific parties, the
hearing did not constitute a contested case for the purposes of obtaining
judicial review pursuant to subsection (a), thus, the trial court did not err
in dismissing plaintiff's appeal for lack of subject matter jurisdiction. 111
H. 124, 139 P.3d 712.

Where appellants failed to comply with the specific
procedures promulgated by the department of land and natural resources,
specifically, Hawaii administrative rule §13-1-29, in requesting a contested
case hearing, such failure precluded judicial review pursuant to this section.
112 H. 28, 143 P.3d 1230.

Where a public hearing pertaining to the issuance of a liquor
license was statutorily required under §§281-52 and 281-57, and petitioner's
legal rights, duties, and privileges were determined based on the public
hearing regarding the decision to grant or deny a liquor license to petitioner,
the public hearing was a "contested case" hearing governed by chapter
91; thus, (1) petitioner was entitled to judicial review under this section,
(2) §91-11 applied to proceedings on petitioner's application for liquor
license, and (3) the liquor commission did not comply with §91-11. 118 H. 320,
189 P.3d 432.

Section 6E-43 and §13-300-51, Hawaii administrative rules
(HAR) confer upon an aggrieved claimant the right to a contested case hearing
as long as the written petition meets the procedural requirements of
§13-300-52, HAR; where it was undisputed that claimant complied with the requirements
of §13-300-52, HAR--that is, claimant's written petition was proper--a
contested case hearing was mandated by statute under §6E-43 and agency rule
under §13-300-51, HAR and thus, was "required by law". 124 H. 1, 237
P.3d 1067.

Where a contested case hearing was required by law under
§6E-43 and §13-300-51, Hawaii administrative rules, and would have determined
the rights, duties, and privileges of specific parties, and: (1) the department
of land and natural resources' denial of claimant's request for a contested
case hearing represented a "final decision and order"; (2) claimant
followed the applicable agency rules and, therefore, was involved
"in" the contested case; and (3) claimant's legal interests were
injured--i.e., claimant had standing to appeal, the circuit court erred in
dismissing claimant's agency appeal for lack of subject matter jurisdiction.
124 H. 1, 237 P.3d 1067.

Where insurance commissioner's decision was appealable
pursuant to this section because it was an order disposing of a petition
brought pursuant to §91-8, and plaintiff was a "person aggrieved" by
the commissioner's decision because it faced increased competition from
allegedly improperly licensed competitors in the managed care plan contract
process, and the decision held that plaintiff's competitors were in fact
properly licensed to offer the services required under those contracts,
plaintiff had standing to appeal the insurance commissioner's decision. 126 H.
326, 271 P.3d 621.

Because the university's conservation district use permit
remained in effect despite the board of land and natural resources' failure to
hold a contested case hearing before voting to grant the permit, the university
could still build on Haleakala and petitioner could still seek effective relief
against the university; thus, the case was not moot. 131 H. 193, 317 P.3d 300
(2013).

Where petitioner met all of the requirements of the
PASH/Kaleikini test, the board of land and natural resources should have held a
contested case hearing, as required by law and requested by petitioner, prior
to decision making on the university's conservation district use application,
and the circuit court had jurisdiction to hear petitioner's agency appeal under
this section. 131 H. 193, 317 P.3d 300 (2013).

Cited in reviewing decision of the labor and industrial
relations appeal board. 1 H. App. 350, 619 P.2d 516.

In overturning agency's order, court was required to make
detailed findings of fact and conclusions of law. 2 H. App. 92, 626 P.2d 199.

Finality of order. 2 H. App. 219, 629 P.2d 125.

Order of board not a "final order" where it remands
a case to determine service-connected issue. 4 H. App. 526, 669 P.2d 638.

Standard used by appellate court when reviewing circuit
court's review of agency decision. 5 H. App. 59, 678 P.2d 576; 5 H. App. 325,
690 P.2d 28; 9 H. App. 198, 828 P.2d. 1284.

Review of agency decision confined to issues properly raised
in record of proceedings leading up to decision. 5 H. App. 115, 678 P.2d 1101.

Public employers directly affected by agency's order were
"aggrieved persons" and their filing of amicus briefs with agency was
sufficient "adversary participation"; standard used by appellate
court when reviewing circuit court's review of agency decision. 5 H. App. 533,
704 P.2d 917.

Does not require that all evidence before agency support its
findings; sufficient if findings supported by reliable, probative, and
substantial evidence. 6 H. App. 540, 735 P.2d 950.

No "contested case" occurred even though there are
situations where a public hearing may be considered a contested case because
department rules established procedures for contested cases. 8 H. App. 16, 791
P.2d 1267.

Service of certified copy of agency decision under this
section is complete when certified copy is deposited in the mail. 9 H. App.
298, 837 P.2d 311.

County of Hawai`i department of finance was an
"agency" within the meaning of chapter 91, and was not a
"person" entitled to appeal under this section (prior to 1993
amendment). 77 H. 396 (App.), 885 P.2d 1137.

Because appellant did not demonstrate that it suffered
concrete injury, it was not a person "aggrieved" by HLRB decision;
thus, it did not have standing to appeal decision to circuit court. 80 H. 376
(App.), 910 P.2d 147.

Although not titled "Notice of Appeal", where
document fairly communicated appellants' intent to appeal appeals
administrator's decision and record contained no indication that the document
misled or prejudiced department in any way, circuit court had jurisdiction over
appellants' appeal. 98 H. 80 (App.), 42 P.3d 657.

Appellants were not entitled to be compensated for their
costs in defending against department's efforts to recoup benefits allegedly
overpaid to them as pursuant to subsection (g), there is no authority vested in
the hearing officer, the circuit court, or the appellate court to award damages
to appellants for these costs. 98 H. 80 (App.), 42 P.3d 657.

Where lessee failed to timely appeal Hawaiian homes
commission's decision to cancel lease, as required under this section,
commission was left without jurisdiction to act on lessee's subsequent requests
for reconsideration. 106 H. 246 (App.), 103 P.3d 406.

Hawaii labor relations board (HLRB) order was not a
"final order" within the meaning of subsection (a) where, in the
order, the HLRB set an evidentiary hearing "to determine whether there had
been bad faith during negotiations, and if there had been repudiation of the
collective bargaining agreement, whether any repudiation was willful";
thus, as the matter was retained for further action and the rights of the
parties remained undetermined because the evidentiary hearing had yet to be
held, circuit court did not err in dismissing appeal when it determined that it
did not have jurisdiction because the order was not a final order. 126 H. 13
(App.), 265 P.3d 482.

Where a hearing on a petition for a declaratory order before
the public utilities commission was discretionary and not required by law, the
dismissal order was not a contested case under §91-1(5); therefore, as a direct
appeal to the intermediate appellate court (ICA) under subsection (b) and
§269-15.5 only applied to contested cases, appellant power company was not entitled
to appeal the dismissal order directly to the ICA; thus, the ICA lacked
jurisdiction over appellant's appeal. 126 H. 242 (App.), 269 P.3d 777.

Subsection (f) does not apply in a family court's review of a
department of human services' placement decision; the family court is not
limited to evidence that the department considered in making its decision to
determine whether or not the department's decision was in the child's best
interests. 130 H. 486 (App.), 312 P.3d 1193 (2013).

Cited: 47 H. 1, 24, 384 P.2d 536; 50 H. 172, 435 P.2d 21.

Mentioned: 904 F. Supp. 1098; 74 H. 181, 840 P.2d 367.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next